Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-123
Adjutant General; disbursing officer; bond or insurance.

The Adjutant General shall be the disbursing officer, unless otherwise ordered by the Governor, for the allotment to be made by the Secretary of the Army and the Secretary of the Air Force under the provisions of the laws of the United States. He or she shall give such bonds to the United States as may be required by the Secretary of the Army and Secretary of the Air Force, respectively, for the faithful accounting and safekeeping and payment of public money coming into his or her hands or entrusted to him or her for disbursement. To satisfy state bonding requirements, the Adjutant General shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.

Laws 1917, c. 205, § 4, p. 485;

Laws 1919, c. 121, § 2, p. 290;

Laws 1921, c. 234, § 1, p. 834;

C.S.1922, § 3305;

C.S.1929, § 55-125;

R.S.1943, § 55-142;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 19, p. 599;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-142;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 21, p. 1588;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 27.